Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3918
Registration of guardianship orders;
filing required.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a
petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in this state, the
guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing
court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in this
state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county
of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office. If the
incapacitated person does not have a conservator and has real property or
an interest in real property in Nebraska, the guardian shall file in every
county where such property is located as required by section 25-2708.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 22.